Massachusetts, session 194th, S1641.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There is hereby created a body politic and corporate and a public instrumentality to be
known as the Massachusetts Municipal Public Safety Building Authority, which shall be an
independent public authority not subject to the supervision and control of any other executive
office, department, commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the
commonwealth except as specifically provided in any general or special law. The exercise by the
authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be considered to be the performance of an
essential public function.
(b) The authority shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson, the
secretary of administration and finance, the secretary of the executive office of public safety and
security, and 6 additional members appointed by the state treasurer, 3 of whom shall have
of 2

practical experience in public safety facilities planning, public safety construction, or
architecture and public safety facility design, and 1 of whom shall be persons in the field of law
enforcement, 1 of whom shall be in the field of firefighting, and one of whom shall be in the
field of emergency medical services, each of whom shall serve a term of 2 years; but, a person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. An appointed member of the
authority shall be eligible for reappointment. The authority shall annually elect 1 of its members
to serve as vice-chairperson. Each member of the authority serving ex officio may appoint a
designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30.
(c) Five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of
five members of the authority shall be necessary and sufficient for any action taken by the
authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to
exercise all the rights and duties of the authority. Members shall serve without pay but shall be
reimbursed for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The
chairperson of the authority shall report to the governor and to the general court no less than
annually, to assist the executive and legislative branches in coordinating public safety and fiscal
policies of the Commonwealth.
(d) Any action of the authority may take effect immediately and need not be published or
posted unless otherwise provided by law. The authority shall be subject to all provisions of
chapter 30A, and records pertaining to the administration of the authority shall be subject to
section 42 of chapter 30 and section 10 of chapter 66. All moneys of the authority shall be
considered to be public funds for purposes of chapter 12A. The operations of the authority shall
be subject to chapter 268A and chapter 268B and all other operational or administrative
standards or requirements to the same extent as the office of the state treasurer.
of 2